New York, session 2025-2026, A339.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "Priscilla's 2 law". 3 § 2. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new section 4 1244 to read as follows: 5 § 1244. Registration of bicycles with electric assist. 1. In a city 6 of one million or more, every bicycle with electric assist as defined in 7 section one hundred two-c of this chapter shall be registered and issued 8 a number plate by the department. No person shall operate a bicycle 9 with electric assist unless such bicycle with electric assist shall have 10 a distinctive number assigned to it by the commissioner and a number 11 plate issued by the commissioner with a number corresponding to that of 12 the certificate of registration. 13 2. Such number plates shall be of such material, form, design and 14 dimensions and contain or set forth such distinguishing number or other 15 identification marks as the commissioner shall prescribe, provided, 16 however, that there shall be at all times a marked contrast between the 17 color of the number plates and that of the numerals or letters thereon. 18 3. Each such number plate shall be conspicuously displayed on the rear 19 of the bicycle, securely fastened so as to prevent the same from swing- 20 ing. 21 4. The fee for such number plates shall be determined by the commis- 22 sioner. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01421-02-5 A. 339--A 2 1 5. Where there is a violation of this section, the fine for such 2 violation shall be determined by the commissioner. 3 § 3. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new section 4 1290 to read as follows: 5 § 1290. Registration of electric scooters. 1. In a city of one million 6 or more, every electric scooter as defined in section one hundred four- 7 teen-e of this chapter shall be registered and issued a number plate by 8 the department. No person shall operate an electric scooter unless such 9 device shall have a distinctive number assigned to it by the commission- 10 er and a number plate issued by the commissioner with a number corre- 11 sponding to that of the certificate of registration. 12 2. Such number plates shall be of such material, form, design and 13 dimensions and contain or set forth such distinguishing number or other 14 identification marks as the commissioner shall prescribe, provided, 15 however, that there shall be at all times a marked contrast between the 16 color of the number plates and that of the numerals or letters thereon. 17 3. Each such number plate shall be conspicuously displayed on the rear 18 of the electric scooter, securely fastened so as to prevent the same 19 from swinging. 20 4. The fee for such number plates shall be determined by the commis- 21 sioner. 22 5. Where there is a violation of this section, the fine for such 23 violation shall be determined by the commissioner. 24 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.